Hawaii statutes.
§180-13 Powers of districts and directors.
A district organized under this chapter, and the directors thereof, shall have,
in addition to other powers granted in this chapter, the power to:

(1) Provide for and encourage surveys,
investigations, and research relating to soil and water conservation, and
publish and disseminate information concerning such subjects;

(2) Provide for and encourage demonstrations relative
to control and prevention of erosion and conservation of soil and water
resources, and carry out preventive and control measures, on publicly owned
lands within the district with the consent of the agency having jurisdiction
thereof, and on other lands with the consent of the occupier of the lands;

(3) Cooperate or enter into agreements with, and
furnish financial or other aid, including machinery, equipment, fertilizer,
seeds, and other material, to any agency or any occupier of lands within the
district, for carrying on soil and water control conservation and operations,
subject to such conditions as the directors may deem necessary;

(4) Acquire property, real or personal, or rights or
interest therein; maintain, administer, and improve the property, receive
income from it, and expend the income in carrying out the purposes of this
chapter; and sell, lease, or otherwise dispose of any of such property;

(5) Construct, improve, and maintain any structures
necessary for carrying out the purposes of this chapter;

(6) Develop plans for conservation of soil and water
resources and control and prevention of erosion within the district, and
publish or otherwise bring them to the attention of district land occupiers;

(7) Accept contributions in money, services,
materials or otherwise from any source, and use or expend them in carrying out
its operations;

(8) Sue and be sued; have a seal, which seal shall be
judicially noticed; and make and execute any necessary contracts or other
instruments;

(9) As a condition to the extending of benefits, or
the performance of work upon lands under this chapter, require land occupiers
to contribute money, services, materials, or otherwise to any operations
conferring such benefits, and impose any other reasonable conditions therefor;

(10) Form associations to coordinate their policies,
objectives, and actions, with power to create staffs, set policies, obtain and
administer soil and water conservation district program funds, provide surety
bonds, coordinate soil and water conservation district projects, and conduct
director training. Other powers shall require the approval of the districts;
and

(11) Appoint associate directors to aid districts, but
without director voting powers. [L 1947, c 191, §7; RL 1955, §28-16; HRS
§180-13; am L 1991, c 94, §4]

Previous
Vol03_Ch0121-0200D
Next